Idaho statutes. Title 52 NUISANCES
Chapter 3
PRIVATE NUISANCES

Sec.

§ 52-301. Remedies for private nuisances.

The remedies against a private nuisance are:

A civil action; or,

Abatement.

§ 52-302. Abatement — When allowed.

A person injured by a private nuisance may abate it by removing, or, if necessary, destroying, the thing which constitutes the nuisance, without committing a breach of the peace, or doing unnecessary injury.

§ 52-303. Abatement — When notice is required.

Where a private nuisance results from a mere omission of the wrongdoer, and cannot be abated without entering upon his land, reasonable notice must be given to him before entering to abate it.